Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1020.
do enact as follows:AB1020,11Section 1. 84.1011 of the statutes is created to read:AB1020,2,9284.1011 State Trooper Memorial Highways. (1) Department to mark 3routes. The department shall erect and maintain markers to memorialize state 4troopers identified in this section. For each marker specified in subs. (2) to (9), the 5department shall erect the marker upon receipt of sufficient contributions from 6interested parties, including any county, city, village, or town, to cover the costs of 7erecting and maintaining the marker along the specified route. No state funds, 8other than from the receipt of contributions under this section, may be expended for 9the erection or maintenance of the markers.AB1020,2,1310(2) Trooper Donald C. Pederson. The department shall designate and, 11subject to sub. (1), mark the route of STH 23 between Princeton Road and Thrasher 12Drive near the city of Green Lake as the “Trooper Donald C. Pederson Memorial 13Highway” in honor and recognition of State Trooper Donald C. Pederson.AB1020,2,1714(3) Trooper Gary G. Powless. The department shall designate and, subject 15to sub. (1), mark the route of STH 59 between South 164th Street and South Elm 16Grove Road in the city of New Berlin as the “Trooper Gary G. Powless Memorial 17Highway” in honor and recognition of State Trooper Gary G. Powless.AB1020,3,218(4) Trooper Debbie M. McMenamin. The department shall designate and, 19subject to sub. (1), mark the route of I 94 between mile post 75 and mile post 76 1south of the city of Eau Claire as the “Trooper Debbie M. McMenamin Memorial 2Highway” in honor and recognition of State Trooper Debbie M. McMenamin.AB1020,3,63(5) Trooper Willie Schoenberger. The department shall designate and, 4subject to sub. (1), mark the route of I 94 between mile post 82 and mile post 83 5north of the city of Osseo as the “Trooper Willie Schoenberger Memorial Highway” 6in honor and recognition of State Trooper Willie Schoenberger.AB1020,3,107(6) Trooper Jorge Dimas. The department shall designate and, subject to 8sub. (1), mark the route of STH 46 between 45th Avenue and 85th Avenue near the 9city of Amery as the “Trooper Jorge Dimas Memorial Highway” in honor and 10recognition of State Trooper Jorge Dimas.AB1020,3,1411(7) Trooper Trevor J. Casper. The department shall designate and, subject 12to sub. (1), mark the route of STH 67 between County Line Road and Fish and 13Game Road near the city of Kiel as the “Trooper Trevor J. Casper Memorial 14Highway” in honor and recognition of State Trooper Trevor J. Casper.AB1020,3,1815(8) Trooper Anthony J. Borostowski. The department shall designate 16and, subject to sub. (1), mark the route of I 90 between mile post 89 and mile post 90 17near the village of Lake Delton as the “Trooper Anthony J. Borostowski Memorial 18Highway” in honor and recognition of State Trooper Anthony J. Borostowski.AB1020,3,2219(9) Trooper Daniel Stainbrook. The department shall designate and, 20subject to sub. (1), mark the route of STH 54 between 48th Street North and County 21Line Road near the city of Wisconsin Rapids as the “Trooper Daniel Stainbrook 22Memorial Highway” in honor and recognition of State Trooper Daniel Stainbrook.AB1020,3,2323